src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Hill Mari (Western Mari) verb inflection

!! ## Irregular lexica

!! Also lexica for +Hom tags

LEXICON VAux !!≈ * **@CODE@** = auxiliaries 
 +Aux: # ;
LEXICON VAUX_NEG !!≈ * **@CODE@** = auxiliaries negative
 +Aux+Neg: # ;

!LEXICON V_AM-HOM1 !!≈ * **@CODE@** homonyms @hid=Hom1
! +Hom1: V_AM ;

!LEXICON V_EM-HOM2 !!≈ * **@CODE@** homonyms @hid=Hom2
! +Hom2: V_EM ;

!LEXICON V_AM_SUB !!≈ * **@CODE@** substandard
! +Err/Orth: V_AM ;

!LEXICON V_EM_SUB !!≈ * **@CODE@** substandard
! +Err/Orth: V_EM ;

!! ## Regular verbs

!! Both *-am* and *-em* verbs and their subgroups.

!! ### V_AM verbs


LEXICON V_IAEM
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 619 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_AM verbs
:%{front%}     V_AM          ;
 :%{front%} INF_FRONT     ;
 :%{front%} ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} PASS-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
LEXICON V_IAEM-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 4 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_AM-SG3 verbs
:%{front%}  V_AM-SG3 ;
LEXICON V_IAEM-3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 2 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_AM-3 verbs
:%{front%}     V_AM-3        ;
 :%{front%} ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} PASS-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} NEG-PRC_FRONT ;

LEXICON V_MOAM
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 465 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM	verbs
:%{back%}     V_AM         ;
 :%{back%} INF_BACK     ;
 :%{back%} ACT-PRC_BACK ;
 :%{back%} PASS-PRC_BACK ;
 :%{back%} NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON V_MOAM-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 2 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-SG3 verbs
:%{back%}     V_AM-SG3     ;
 :%{back%} ACT-PRC_BACK ;
 :%{back%} PASS-PRC_BACK ;
 :%{back%} NEG-PRC_BACK ;
LEXICON V_MOAM-3
!! Approximately 1 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-3 verbs
:%{back%}  V_AM-3 ;

!! ### STEM CHANGE
LEXICON V_PYECHKAEM
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 12 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM verbs
:%{front%}     V_AM          ;
 :%{front%} INF_FRONT     ;
 :%{front%} ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} PASS-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
!LEXICON V_PYECHKAEM-SG3
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-SG3 verbs
!:%{front%}     V_AM-SG3      ;
! :%{front%} ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
! :%{front%} PASS-PRC_FRONT ;
! :%{front%} NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
!LEXICON V_PYECHKAEM-3
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-3 verbs
!:%{front%}  V_AM-3 ;

LEXICON V_KACHKAM
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 11 2014-12-21
!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM verbs
:%{back%}     V_AM         ;
 :%{back%} INF_BACK     ;
 :%{back%} ACT-PRC_BACK ;
 :%{back%} PASS-PRC_BACK ;
 :%{back%} NEG-PRC_BACK ;
!LEXICON V_KACHKAM-SG3
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-SG3 verbs
!:%{back%}     V_AM-SG3     ;
! :%{back%} ACT-PRC_BACK ;
! :%{back%} PASS-PRC_BACK ;
! :%{back%} NEG-PRC_BACK ;
!LEXICON V_KACHKAM-3
!!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!!! Approximately 0 2014-12-21
!!! Back Vowel harmony for  V_AM-3 verbs
!:%{back%}     V_AM-3        ;

!! ### V_EM verbs

LEXICON	V_VIDEM
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 1052 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_EM	verbs
:%{front%}     V_EM          ;
 :%{front%} INF_FRONT     ;
 :%{front%} ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} PASS-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} NEG-PRC_FRONT ;
LEXICON	V_VIDEM-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 2 2014-12-21
!! Front Vowel harmony for V_EM-SG3 verbs
:%{front%}     V_EM-SG3      ;
 :%{front%} ACT-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} PASS-PRC_FRONT ;
 :%{front%} NEG-PRC_FRONT ;

LEXICON	V_AZEM
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 1315 2014-12-21
!! Back	Vowel harmony for  V_EM verbs
:%{back%}     V_EM          ;
 :%{back%} INF_BACK      ;
 :%{back%} ACT-PRC_BACK  ;
 :%{back%} PASS-PRC_BACK  ;
 :%{back%} NEG-PRC_BACK  ;
LEXICON	V_AZEM-SG3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 4 2014-12-21
!! Back	Vowel harmony for  V_EM verbs
:%{back%}     V_EM-SG3      ;
 :%{back%} ACT-PRC_BACK  ;
 :%{back%} PASS-PRC_BACK  ;
 :%{back%} NEG-PRC_BACK  ;
LEXICON	V_AZEM-3
!! LEXICON @LEXNAME@
!! Approximately 1 2014-12-21
!! Back	Vowel harmony for  V_EM verbs
:%{back%}     V_EM-3        ;

!! ## Lexica pointing to suffix lexica

!! ### Intermediate AM lexica

LEXICON V_AM !!= @CODE@ ӹштӓш:ӹшт
                          INDPRSSG1-am        ;
                          INDPRSSG2-am        ;
                          INDPRSSG3-am        ;
                          INDPRSPL1-am        ;
                          INDPRSPL2-am        ;
                          INDPRSPL3-am        ;
                          INDPRSCONNEG-am     ;
                          INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am  ;

                          INDPRT1SG1-am       ;
                          INDPRT1SG2-am       ;
                          INDPRT1SG3-am       ;
                          INDPRT1PL1-am       ;
                          INDPRT1PL2-am       ;
                          INDPRT1PL3-am       ;
                          INDPRT1CONNEG-am    ;
                          INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am ;

                          INDPRT2SG1-am       ;
                          INDPRT2SG2-am       ;
                          INDPRT2SG3-am       ;
                          INDPRT2PL1-am       ;
                          INDPRT2PL2-am       ;
                          INDPRT2PL3-am       ;
                          INDPRT2NEG-am       ;


                          IMPRTSG2-am         ;
                          IMPRTSG3-am         ;
                          IMPRTPL2-am         ;
                          IMPRTPL3-am         ;

                          IMPRTIISG2-am       ;
                          IMPRTIIPL2-am       ;

                          DES-am              ;

!                         INF                 ;
!        +Act+Prc:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} K                   ; !! Contlex needed
! +Act+Prc+Der+Der/шЫ+A:%>ш%{ыӹØ%} NMN_TYERVYE           ;
!                         PASS-PRC             ;
!                         NEG-PRC             ;

LEXICON V_AM-3
     V_AM-SG3            ;
 INDPRSPL3-am        ;
 INDPRSPL3CONNEG-am  ;
 INDPRT1PL3-am       ;
 INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am ;
 INDPRT2PL3-am       ;
 INDPRT2NEG-am       ;
 IMPRTPL3-am         ;
